Hawaii statutes.
[§661-31] Certain
actions barred. (a) In no event may a person bring an action under this
part that is based upon allegations or transactions which are the subject of a
civil suit or an administrative civil money penalty proceeding in which the
State is already a party.

(b) The court shall dismiss an action or claim
under this part, unless opposed by the State, if the allegations or
transactions alleged in the action or claim are substantially the same as those
publicly disclosed:

(1) In a state criminal, civil, or administrative
hearing in which the State or its agent is a party;

(2) In a state legislative or other state report,
hearing, audit, or investigation; or

(3) By the news media,

unless the action is brought by the attorney general
or the person bringing the action is an original source of the information.

(c) For purposes of this section,
"original source" means an individual who:

(1) Prior to public disclosure under subsection (b),
has voluntarily disclosed to the State the information on which the allegations
or transactions in a claim are based; or

(2) Has knowledge that is independent of and
materially adds to the publicly disclosed allegations or transactions, and who
has voluntarily provided the information to the State before filing an action
under this part. [L 2012, c 294, pt of §5]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next